North Carolina, session 2025, HB1092.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

AREA MEDIAN INCOME CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT
SECTION 1.(a) Section 2 of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2. State and local taxation.
…
(3) Exemptions. Property belonging to the State, counties, and municipal corporations
shall be exempt from taxation. The General Assembly may exempt cemeteries and property held
for educational, scientific, literary, cultural, charitable, or religious purposes, and, to a value not
exceeding $300, any personal property. The General Assembly may exempt from taxation not
exceeding $1,000 in value of property held and used as the place of residence of the owner. Every
exemption shall be on a State-wide basis and shall be made by general law uniformly applicable
in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government. No taxing authority other
than the General Assembly may grant exemptions, and the General Assembly shall not delegate
the powers accorded to it by this subsection. The General Assembly may use area median income
as a criterion for affording property tax relief on a statewide basis by a general law uniformly
applicable in every county, city and town, and other unit of local government.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at a statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in
the State. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to allow the General Assembly to use area median income
as a criterion for affording property tax relief on a statewide basis."
*H1092-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.

PROPERTY TAX HOMESTEAD CIRCUIT BREAKER MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-277.1B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1B. Property tax homestead circuit breaker.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section.
(b) Definitions. – The definitions provided in G.S. 105-277.1 apply to this section.
(c) Income Eligibility Limit. – The income eligibility limit provided in G.S.
105-277.1(a2) applies to this section.is equal to (i) one hundred percent (100%) of the area
median income of the county in which the permanent residence is located for a non-married
qualifying owner and (ii) one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the area median income of the
county in which the permanent residence is located for a married qualifying owner.
(d) Qualifying Owner. – For the purpose of qualifying for the property tax homestead
circuit breaker under this section, a qualifying owner is an owner who meets all of the following
requirements as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the benefit is claimed:
(1) The owner has an income for the preceding calendar year of not more than
one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the income eligibility limit specified in
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The owner has owned the property as a permanent residence for at least five
consecutive years and has occupied the property as a permanent residence for
at least five years.
(3) The owner is at least 65 years of age or totally and permanently disabled.
(4) The owner is a North Carolina resident.
(e) Multiple Owners. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by husband and wife
is entitled to the full benefit of the property tax homestead circuit breaker notwithstanding that
only one of them meets the length of occupancy and ownership requirements and the age or
disability requirement of this section. When a permanent residence is owned and occupied by
two or more persons other than husband and wife, no property tax homestead circuit breaker is
allowed unless all of the owners qualify and elect to defer taxes under this section.
(f) Tax Limitation. – A qualifying owner may defer the portion a proportional amount of
the principal amount of tax that is imposed for the current tax year on his or her permanent
residence and exceeds the percentage of the qualifying owner's income set out in the table in this
subsection. If a permanent residence is subject to tax by more than one taxing unit and the total
tax liability exceeds the tax limit imposed by this section, then both the taxes due under this
section and the taxes deferred under this section must be apportioned among the taxing units
based upon the ratio each taxing unit's tax rate bears to the total tax rate of all units.
Income Over Income Up To Percentage
-0- Income Eligibility Limit 4.0%
Page 2 House Bill 1092-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Income Eligibility Limit 150% of Income Eligibility Limit5.0%that is equal to the
proportional amount of the homestead's appraised value that does not exceed the county
median appraised value of the owner-occupied residential property.
(g) Temporary Absence. – An otherwise qualifying owner does not lose the benefit of
this circuit breaker because of a temporary absence from his or her permanent residence for
reasons of health, or because of an extended absence while confined to a rest home or nursing
home, so long as the residence is unoccupied or occupied by the owner's spouse or other
dependent.
(h) Deferred Taxes. – The difference between the taxes due under this section and the
taxes that would have been payable in the absence of this section are a lien on the real property
of the taxpayer as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). G.S. 105-355(a); provided, however, liens
remaining after (i) a qualifying owner's death or (ii) the devise of the property to a member of
the owner's family, as defined in subdivision (i)(1) of this section, shall be deemed satisfied and
no deferred taxes shall be due thereon. The difference in taxes must be carried forward in the
records of each taxing unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes for the preceding three fiscal
years are due and payable in accordance with G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its
eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying event described in subsection (i) of this
section. On or before September 1 of each year, the collector must send to the mailing address of
a residence on which taxes have been deferred a notice stating the amount of deferred taxes and
interest that would be due and payable upon the occurrence of a disqualifying event.
(i) Disqualifying Events. – Each of the following constitutes a disqualifying event:
(1) The owner transfers the residence. Transfer of the residence is not a
disqualifying event if (i) the owner transfers the residence to a co-owner of
the residence or, as part of a divorce proceeding, to his or her spouse and (ii)
that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.residence or (ii) the owner transfers the residence to a
member of the owner's family and the person to whom the residence was
transferred satisfies the income eligibility limit provided by this section. For
purposes of this subdivision, "family" means the owner's, or the owner's
spouse's lineal descendant, lineal ascendant, or sibling, and the spouse of any
of these individuals.
(2) The owner dies. Death of the owner is not a disqualifying event if (i) the
owner's share passes to a co-owner of the residence or to his or her spouse and
(ii) that individual occupies or continues to occupy the property as his or her
permanent residence.
(3) The owner ceases to use the property as a permanent residence.
…."

NONPROFIT OWNERSHIP REQUIREMENTS FOR PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 105-278.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-278.6. Real and personal property used for charitable purposes.purposes by certain
entities.
(a) Real and personal property owned by:by an entity listed in this subsection is exempt
from taxation if (i) as to real property, it is actually and exclusively occupied and used, and as to
personal property, it is entirely and completely used, by the owner for a charitable purpose; and
(ii) the owner is not organized or operated for profit. The entities are:
(1) A Young Men's Christian Association or similar organization;organization.
(2) A home for the aged, sick, or infirm;infirm.
(3) An orphanage or similar home;home.
(4) A Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals;Animals.
(5) A reformatory or correctional institution;institution.
House Bill 1092-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) A monastery, convent, or nunnery;nunnery.
(7) A nonprofit, life-saving, first aid, or rescue squad organization;organization.
(8) A nonprofit organization providing housing for individuals or families with
low or moderate incomesincomes, other than rental housing, which is subject
to G.S. 105-278.7A.
shall be exempted from taxation if: (i) As to real property, it is actually and exclusively occupied
and used, and as to personal property, it is entirely and completely used, by the owner for
charitable purposes; and (ii) the owner is not organized or operated for profit.
(b) A charitable purpose within the meaning of this section is one that has humane and
philanthropic objectives; it is an activity that benefits humanity or a significant rather than limited
segment of the community without expectation of pecuniary profit or reward. The humane
treatment of animals is also a charitable purpose.
(c) The fact that a building or facility is incidentally available to and patronized by the
general public, so long as there is no material amount of business or patronage with the general
public, shall does not defeat the exemption granted by this section.
(d) Notwithstanding the exclusive-use exclusive use requirements of this section, if part
of a property that otherwise meets the section's requirements is used for a purpose that would
require exemption under subsection (a), above, if the entire property were so used, the valuation
of the part so used shall be exempted is exempt from taxation.
(e) Real property held by an organization described in subdivision (a)(8) for a charitable
purpose under this section as a future site for housing housing, other than affordable rental
housing as defined in G.S. 105-278.7A, for individuals or families with low or moderate incomes
may be classified under this section for no more than 10 five years. The taxes that would
otherwise be due on real property exempt under this subsection shall be are a lien on the property
as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The taxes shall be are carried forward in the records of the taxing
unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes are due and payable in accordance with
G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying
event. A disqualifying event occurs when the property was is not used for low- or
moderate-income housing within 10 five years from the first day of the fiscal year the property
was classified under this subsection. In addition to the provisions in G.S. 105-277.1F, all liens
arising under this subdivision are extinguished when the property is used for low- or
moderate-income housing within the time period allowed under this subsection."
SECTION 3.(b) Article 12 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new section to read:
"§ 105-278.7A. Real and personal property owned, in whole or in part, by a charitable
nonprofit and used for affordable rental housing.
(a) Exemption Generally. – Real and personal property owned by an eligible owner and
used for a charitable purpose in the operation of affordable rental housing is exempt from taxation
to the extent provided in this section if the requirements of this section are met.
(b) Definitions. –The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Affiliate. – Defined in G.S. 105-130.2.
(2) Affordable rental housing. – A rental housing development consisting of land
and improvements in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the units are
qualifying units.
(3) Charitable purpose. – A charitable purpose within the meaning of this section
is one that has humane and philanthropic objectives; it is an activity that
benefits humanity or a significant rather than limited segment of the
community without expectation of pecuniary profit or reward.
(4) Eligible joint venture. – A limited partnership, limited liability company, or
limited liability partnership in which a general partner or limited liability
company managing member is an eligible nonprofit corporation.
Page 4 House Bill 1092-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Eligible nonprofit corporation. – A nonprofit described in 501(c)(3) of the
Code that (i) is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of
the Code, (ii) is incorporated under a certificate of existence or admitted under
a certificate of authority under the North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act
as provided in Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, and (iii) has day-to-day
control of the operations of and decisions for the affordable rental housing and
has not delegated any decision-making authority other than to a property
manager serving under the direction of the eligible owner. The term includes
a single-purpose entity wholly owned by an eligible nonprofit corporation.
(6) Eligible owner. – An eligible joint venture or an eligible nonprofit corporation.
(7) Income limit. – Eighty percent (80%) of area median income, adjusted for
family size, as set and most recently published by the U.S. Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(8) Qualifying unit. – An affordable rental housing unit for which both of the
following conditions are met:
a. The rent charged for an occupied unit or the published rent for a vacant
unit is at or below the rent limit.
b. It is occupied by, or set aside for, a tenant whose income is at or below
the income limit.
(9) Rent limit. – Rent, plus a utility allowance calculated in accordance with the
requirements of the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency, that does not
exceed thirty percent (30%) of the income limit.
(c) Requirements for Government-Supported Affordable Rental Housing. – Real and
personal property that provides government-supported affordable rental housing is exempt from
property taxation in any year in which all of the conditions listed in this subsection are met. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "government-supported" means that the property is financed
as described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (2) of this subsection. The conditions are:
(1) The property is owned and operated by an eligible nonprofit corporation or an
eligible joint venture.
(2) Either of the following applies:
a. The eligible owner is an eligible joint venture that receives
low-income housing credits pursuant to section 42 of the Code and
that is in compliance with any applicable regulatory requirements as
determined by the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
Ownership is determined as of the date the certificate of occupancy is
issued.
b. The eligible owner finances the acquisition, rehabilitation,
development, or operation of the property, or any combination thereof,
with tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds, qualified 501(c)(3) bonds,
federal direct loans or grants, State loans or grants, or loans or grants
provided by a local jurisdiction in which the property is located. Such
government support must require the execution of a deed restriction or
enforceable, verifiable agreement with a public agency requiring that
the property be operated as affordable rental housing in accordance
with this section for a period of at least 15 years from the date the
financing or financial assistance was initially provided. Government
support does not include payments made to the owner under the federal
Housing Choice Voucher Program or other local, State, or federal
voucher program.
(d) Requirements for Non-Government-Supported Affordable Rental Housing. – Real
and personal property that provides non-government-supported affordable rental housing is
House Bill 1092-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
exempt from property taxation in any year in which all of the conditions listed in this subsection
are met. For purposes of this subsection, the term "non-government-supported" means that the
property is not financed as described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (2) of subsection
(c) of this section. The conditions are:
(1) The property is one hundred percent (100%) owned and operated by an
eligible nonprofit corporation that has owned and operated affordable rental
housing for at least five years.
(2) The eligible nonprofit corporation, including any of its subsidiaries or
nonprofit affiliates, does not receive any funding or financial assistance, other
than grants, from a for-profit affiliate.
(3) The eligible nonprofit corporation does not lease the affordable rental housing
land or improvements to another entity. This subdivision does not apply to the
leasing of affordable rental housing units to tenants.
(4) The eligible nonprofit corporation has executed a deed restriction in favor of
the county and any municipality in which the property is located requiring that
the property be operated as affordable rental housing in accordance with this
section for a period of at least 15 years from the date of application. The
restriction must require that the owner provide the reporting required under
subsection (g) of this section annually to all grantees for the term of the deed
restriction. The deed restriction must state that any grantee, or its assigns, has
the right to enforce the terms of the restriction.
(e) Exemption Amount. – The exemption amount is the percentage of the appraised value
that is equal to the percentage of qualifying units unless the eligible owner meets the requirements
of the safe harbor in Section 3 of Internal Revenue Service Rev. Proc. 96-32, in which case the
exemption amount is one hundred percent (100%) of the appraised value of the property. A
transition period of one taxable year applies to improved and occupied rental housing property
purchased by an eligible owner for which the eligible owner cannot provide the total household
income for each qualifying unit at the time of application but that otherwise meets the
requirements of this section. During the transition period, a "qualifying unit" is an affordable
rental housing unit for which the rent charged is at or below the rent limit for purposes of
determining the exemption amount.
(f) Application. – To be eligible for an exemption under this section, an eligible owner
must submit an application in accordance with G.S. 105-282.1. The application form shall
require the applicant to provide the following information:
(1) Whether the applicant is applying for the exemption under subsection (c) or
subsection (d) of this section, along with documentation supporting that the
applicant is an eligible owner for the subsection under which it is applying;
evidence of government support pursuant to sub-subdivision a. or b. of
subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, if applicable; and a copy of
the applicable deed restriction or regulatory agreement.
(2) Whether the property is subject to a transition period as described in
subsection (e) of this section.
(3) Either of the following, as of last day of the month immediately preceding
January 1 of the year of application:
a. If the applicant is applying for an exemption amount based on the
percentage of qualifying units, the percentage of qualifying units by
providing the following items:
1. The rent amount received by the owner for each qualifying unit
as evidenced by an anonymized rent roll. The applicant must
provide evidence of the published rent if a unit is vacant.
Page 6 House Bill 1092-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. The total household income for each occupied qualifying unit,
except during the transition period, evidenced in an
anonymized manner.
b. If the applicant is applying for an exemption amount based on meeting
the requirements of the safe harbor in Section 3 of Internal Revenue
Service Rev. Proc. 96-32, evidence demonstrating the affordable
rental housing meets those requirements.
(4) Certification that the applicant is in compliance with any applicable deed
restriction or regulatory agreement and the requirements of this section.
(g) Compliance. – An eligible owner that has been granted an exemption under this
section must, on an annual basis by January 31 following the initial exemption, certify that it
remains in compliance with this section and provide to the taxing unit the items listed in
subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of this section, as of the previous December 31, including any
supporting documentation required by the taxing unit. Failure to meet these requirements within
the time limits subjects the property to discovery under G.S. 105-312. For purposes of satisfying
this requirement, the household income provided for each qualifying unit must be verified every
two years following initial verification of the tenant's income.
(h) Future Site. – Real property held by an eligible owner as a future site for affordable
rental housing may be classified under this section for no more than five years. The taxes that
would otherwise be due on real property exempt under this subsection are a lien on the property
as provided in G.S. 105-355(a). The taxes shall be carried forward in the records of the taxing
unit as deferred taxes. The deferred taxes are due and payable in accordance with
G.S. 105-277.1F when the property loses its eligibility for deferral as a result of a disqualifying
event. A disqualifying event occurs when the property is not used for affordable rental housing
that is in compliance with this section within five years from the first day of the fiscal year the
property was classified under this section. In addition to the provisions in G.S. 105-277.1F, all
liens arising under this subsection are extinguished when the property is used for affordable rental
housing within the time period allowed under this subsection. For purposes of this subsection,
the term "future site" means unimproved real property or improved real property that is not
occupied as of the date of the application for exemption under this section.
(i) Ineligible Property. – Property that has been designated a special class of property
under G.S. 105-277.16 and assessed accordingly is not eligible for exemption under this section."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 105-277.1F(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Scope. – This section applies to the following deferred tax programs:
(1) G.S. 105-275(12), real property owned by a nonprofit corporation held as a
protected natural area.
(1a) G.S. 105-275(29a), historic district property held as future site of historic
structure.
(2) G.S. 105-277.1B, the property tax homestead circuit breaker.
(2a) (See note for repeal) G.S. 105-277.1D, the inventory property tax deferral.
(3) G.S. 105-277.4(c), present-use value property.
(4) G.S. 105-277.14, working waterfront property.
(4a) G.S. 105-277.15, wildlife conservation land.
(4b) G.S. 105-277.15A, site infrastructure land.
(5) G.S. 105-278(b), historic property.
(6) G.S. 105-278.6(e), nonprofit property held as future site of low- or
moderate-income housing.housing, other than affordable rental housing as
defined under G.S. 105-278.7A.
(7) G.S. 105-278.7A(h), nonprofit property held as future site of affordable rental
housing."
House Bill 1092-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(d) This section is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years
beginning on or after July 1, 2026, and, with respect to property held as a future site under
G.S. 105-278.6(e) or G.S. 105-278.7A(h), as enacted by this act, applies to real property
classified under those provisions on or after that date. Notwithstanding G.S. 105-282.1(a)(2)a.,
an owner of low- or moderate-income rental housing property that is exempt under
G.S. 105-278.6(a)(8) as of the effective date of this act must, by December 31, 2026, reapply for
the exemption, providing the assessor of the taxing unit with any necessary documentation for
compliance consistent with this act. Reapplication under this section is considered an application
under subsection (f) of G.S. 105-278.7A, as enacted by this act. Failure to meet this requirement
within the time limit subjects the property to discovery under G.S. 105-312.

NCACC GRANT FUNDING FOR REAPPRAISAL TECHNOLOGY
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Association of County Commissioners (Association) the nonrecurring sum of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Association to provide
grants to local governments for the purpose of transitioning those governments to shortened
reappraisal cycles and thereby ensure more frequent and accurate property valuations. Grant
funds provided under this section shall be used by local governments for (i) technical assistance
and (ii) one-time capital investments in technological infrastructure that improve local capacity
and efficiency in conducting reappraisals, including the acquisition of specialized software, data
migration, and the implementation of digital systems. In awarding grants under this section, the
Association shall prioritize awarding grants to local governments operating on a reappraisal cycle
of more than four years. For purposes of this section, "local governments" means counties, cities,
or towns conducting reappraisals of property under Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General
Statutes as of the effective date of this section.
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this act becomes effective for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2027, only if the constitutional amendment proposed by Section 1 of this act is
approved; otherwise, Section 2 of this act shall have no effect. Unless otherwise provided, the
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 8 House Bill 1092-First Edition